Maryland, session 2025, HB1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 50 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 50. DEVELOPERS AND DEPLOYERS OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEMS.
14–5001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION” MEANS DIFFERENTIAL
TREATMENT AS A RESULT OF THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE THAT
NEGATIVELY IMPACTS A PERSON BASED ON THE PERSON’S ACTUAL OR PERCEIVED
AGE, COLOR, DISABILITY, ETHNICITY, GENETIC INFORMATION, PROFICIENCY IN THE
ENGLISH LANGUAGE, NATIONAL ORIGIN, RACE, RELIGION, REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH,
SEX, VETERAN STATUS, OR OTHER PROTECTED CLASS.
(2) “ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 1331 3
(I) THE OFFER, LICENSE, OR USE OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM BY A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER FOR:
1. TESTING TO IDENTIFY, MITIGATE, OR PREVENT
DISCRIMINATION OR ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH A STATE OR FEDERAL LAW; OR
2. INCREASING DIVERSITY WITHIN AN APPLICANT,
CUSTOMER, OR PARTICIPANT POOL; OR
(II) AN ACTION THAT BENEFITS AN ESTABLISHMENT THAT:
1. IS SUBJECT TO 42 U.S.C. § 2000A(E); AND
2. IS NOT IN FACT OPEN TO THE PUBLIC.
(C) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3.5–801
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(D) “DATASET CARD” MEANS A FILE THAT:
(1) IS USED TO INFORM USERS ABOUT HOW TO RESPONSIBLY USE THE
DATA IN A DATASET; AND
(2) CONTAINS INFORMATION ABOUT POTENTIAL BIASES OF THE
DATA.
(E) “DECISION THAT PRODUCES LEGAL OR SIMILARLY SIGNIFICANT
EFFECTS CONCERNING THE CONSUMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701
OF THIS TITLE.
(F) “HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” MEANS ANY
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT, WHEN DEPLOYED, MAKES, OR IS A
SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR IN MAKING, A DECISION THAT PRODUCES LEGAL OR
SIMILARLY SIGNIFICANT EFFECTS CONCERNING THE CONSUMER.
(G) “MODEL CARD” MEANS A FILE THAT ACCOMPANIES THE MODEL AND
PROVIDES INFORMATION ABOUT DISCOVERABILITY, REPRODUCIBILITY, AND
SHARING.
14–5002.
(A) A DEVELOPER SHALL TAKE REASONABLE PRECAUTIONS TO PROTECT
CONSUMERS FROM KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC

HOUSE BILL 1331
DISCRIMINATION FROM THE INTENDED USES OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM PRODUCED BY THE DEVELOPER.
(B) A DEVELOPER THAT OFFERS TO SELL A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE TO A PURCHASER OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THE STANDARDIZED DISCLOSURE DOCUMENTATION
PERTAINING TO THE USES OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM
AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) PROVIDE TO A DEPLOYER INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR THE
DEPLOYER TO COMPLETE AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT UNDER § 14–5004 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(3) PUBLISH, ON THE DEVELOPER’S WEBSITE OR IN A PUBLIC USE
CASE INVENTORY, STANDARDIZED INFORMATION PERTAINING TO EACH HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT THE DEVELOPER OFFERS FOR PURCHASE.
(C) THE STANDARDIZED DISCLOSURE DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE PURPOSE OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM;
(2) THE INTENDED USES, BENEFITS, AND OUTPUTS OF THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(3) A DESCRIPTION OF THE KNOWN AND REASONABLY FORESEEABLE:
(I) USES AND MISUSES OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, AND THE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION
ARISING FROM THEM; AND
(II) LIMITATIONS OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(4) A DESCRIPTION OF THE STEPS TAKEN BY THE DEVELOPER PRIOR
TO OFFERING A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM FOR PURCHASE TO:
(I) EVALUATE THE PERFORMANCE OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND

HOUSE BILL 1331 5
(II) MITIGATE KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE
ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION ARISING FROM THE USE OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(5) A SUMMARY OF THE DATA USED TO TRAIN THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(6) A DESCRIPTION OF THE DATA GOVERNANCE MEASURES THAT
APPLIED TO THE DATA USED TO TRAIN THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM;
(7) THE MEASURES TAKEN TO EXAMINE:
(I) THE SUITABILITY OF DATA SOURCES; AND
(II) POSSIBLE BIASES AND APPROPRIATE MITIGATION;
(8) BEST PRACTICES FOR THE INTENDED USE, PREVENTION OF
MISUSE, AND MONITORING OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(9) ANY INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR THE PURCHASER TO COMPLY
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 14–5003 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(10) ANY INFORMATION REASONABLY NECESSARY TO ALLOW THE
PURCHASER TO UNDERSTAND THE OUTPUTS OF AND MONITOR THE PERFORMANCE
OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(D) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL, TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE, BE PROVIDED IN THE FORM OF MODEL
CARDS, DATASET CARDS, OR PREEXISTING IMPACT ASSESSMENTS.
(E) THE DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED TO BE PUBLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) SUMMARIZE THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS
THAT THE DEVELOPER OFFERS FOR SALE;
(2) SUMMARIZE THE MEASURES TAKEN BY THE DEVELOPER TO
MANAGE KNOWN AND REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC
DISCRIMINATION THAT THE DEVELOPER OFFERS FOR SALE; AND
(3) BE UPDATED:

HOUSE BILL 1331
(I) AS NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE DOCUMENTATION
REMAINS ACCURATE; AND
(II) NOT LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER ANY CHANGE IS MADE TO
A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT WOULD NECESSITATE
UPDATING THE RELEVANT DOCUMENTATION UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS
SECTION.
(F) A DEVELOPER THAT LEARNS THROUGH ONGOING INTERNAL TESTING,
OR THROUGH A CREDIBLE REPORT, THAT A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM OFFERED FOR SALE BY THE DEVELOPER HAS CAUSED, OR IS LIKELY TO
CAUSE, ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION SHALL DISCLOSE THE POTENTIAL FOR
ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION TO:
(1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN A FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED
BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL; AND
(2) ALL PURCHASERS OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
DEVELOPER TO DISCLOSE:
(1) A TRADE SECRET;
(2) INFORMATION PROTECTED FROM DISCLOSURE BY STATE OR
FEDERAL LAW; OR
(3) INFORMATION THAT WOULD OTHERWISE CREATE A SECURITY
RISK TO THE DEVELOPER.
(H) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY REQUIRE A DEVELOPER TO DISCLOSE TO
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION.
14–5003.
(A) A DEPLOYER SHALL TAKE REASONABLE PRECAUTIONS TO PROTECT
CONSUMERS FROM KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC
DISCRIMINATION POSED BY THE INTENDED USES OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM DEPLOYED BY THE DEPLOYER.

HOUSE BILL 1331 7
(B) A DEPLOYER SHALL IMPLEMENT A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY TO
GOVERN THE DEPLOYMENT OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(C) A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY, DOCUMENT, AND MITIGATE KNOWN AND REASONABLY
FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION;
(2) SPECIFY AND INCORPORATE PRINCIPLES, PROCESSES, AND
PERSONNEL USED TO COMPLY WITH ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(3) BE PLANNED TO SPAN, AND BE IMPLEMENTED FOR, THE ENTIRE
PERIOD DURING WHICH THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS TO
BE DEPLOYED; AND
(4) BE REGULARLY AND SYSTEMATICALLY REVIEWED AND UPDATED
THROUGHOUT THE PERIOD DURING WHICH THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS DEPLOYED.
(D) A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
MAY APPLY TO MORE THAN ONE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(E) IN CREATING A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION, A DEPLOYER SHALL CONSIDER AND REASONABLY ADDRESS:
(1) (I) GUIDANCE SET FORTH IN THE MOST UP–TO–DATE VERSION
OF THE “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE RISK MANAGEMENT FRAMEWORK”
PUBLISHED BY THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY;
(II) ISE/IEC 42001 OF THE INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATION
FOR STANDARDIZATION;
(III) ANOTHER INTERNATIONALLY RECOGNIZED ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE RISK MANAGEMENT FRAMEWORK THAT CONTAINS REQUIREMENTS
AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(IV) ANOTHER RISK MANAGEMENT FRAMEWORK DESIGNATED
BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(2) THE SIZE AND COMPLEXITY OF THE DEPLOYER;

HOUSE BILL 1331
(3) THE NATURE, USES, AND SCOPE OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(4) THE SENSITIVITY AND VOLUME OF DATA PROCESSED BY THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
14–5004.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, A DEPLOYER
SHALL:
(1) COMPLETE AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT OF ANY DEPLOYED
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(2) RETAIN ALL IMPACT ASSESSMENTS AND RECORDS RELATING TO
AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS AFTER THE END OF THE
DEPLOYMENT OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(3) NOT LESS THAN ONCE EACH YEAR, ASSESS WHETHER A
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM DEPLOYED BY THE DEPLOYER IS
CAUSING ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION;
(4) MAKE AVAILABLE, AT THE TIME OF DEPLOYMENT, A
STANDARDIZED DISCLOSURE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 14–5005 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(5) PROVIDE A CONSUMER SUBJECT TO A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM DEPLOYED BY THE DEPLOYER AN OPPORTUNITY TO:
(I) CORRECT ANY DATA PROCESSED BY THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IN MAKING A DECISION ABOUT THE CONSUMER;
AND
(II) APPEAL AN ADVERSE DECISION MADE USING A HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, INCLUDING HUMAN REVIEW OF THE DECISION;
AND
(6) MAKE A CLEAR AND PROMINENTLY DISPLAYED STATEMENT
AVAILABLE ON THE DEPLOYER’S WEBSITE THAT:
(I) SUMMARIZES THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEMS CURRENTLY DEPLOYED BY THE DEPLOYER;

HOUSE BILL 1331 9
(II) SUMMARIZES THE DEPLOYER’S PRACTICES FOR MANAGING
THE KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC
DISCRIMINATION APPLICABLE TO DEPLOYED HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS;
(III) DETAILS THE NATURE, SOURCE, AND EXTENT OF PERSONAL
INFORMATION COLLECTED OR USED BY THE DEPLOYER; AND
(IV) IS UPDATED PERIODICALLY.
(B) A DEPLOYER MAY DECLINE TO PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR APPEAL
IF THE APPEAL WOULD BE AGAINST THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CONSUMER,
INCLUDING SITUATIONS IN WHICH THE DELAY CAUSED BY THE APPEAL COULD POSE
A RISK TO THE SAFETY OF THE CONSUMER.
(C) A DEPLOYER NEED NOT PROVIDE A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY, AN
IMPACT ASSESSMENT, OR THE DISCLOSURES REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(6)
OF THIS SECTION IF THE DEPLOYER:
(1) EMPLOYS FEWER THAN 50 FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT EMPLOYEES;
(2) TRAINS THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM ON
DATA OTHER THAN DATA COLLECTED BY THE DEPLOYER;
(3) DOES NOT TRAIN THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM ON DATA THAT THE DEPLOYER COLLECTS;
(4) USES THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM AS
INTENDED BY ITS DEVELOPER, AS DISCLOSED UNDER § 14–5002(C) OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(5) MAKES AVAILABLE TO A CONSUMER AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT:
(I) COMPLETED BY AND PROVIDED TO THE DEPLOYER BY THE
DEVELOPER OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(II) THAT IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO AN IMPACT
ASSESSMENT OTHERWISE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
14–5005.
A STANDARDIZED DISCLOSURE UNDER § 14–5004(A)(4) OF THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1331
(1) NOTIFY A CONSUMER SUBJECT TO THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS IN
USE;
(2) DISCLOSE THE PURPOSE OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IN USE, INCLUDING THE NATURE OF A DECISION ABOUT A
CONSUMER THAT IS MADE BY THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(3) PROVIDE THE CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE DEPLOYER;
(4) PROVIDE A PLAIN LANGUAGE DESCRIPTION OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(5) PROVIDE INSTRUCTIONS REGARDING HOW TO ACCESS THE
STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER § 14–5004(C)(5) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(6) DISCLOSE THE DECISION THAT THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS DEPLOYED TO MAKE OR CONTRIBUTE TO MAKING;
(7) DISCLOSE THE REASON FOR THE DECISION THAT THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS DEPLOYED TO MAKE OR CONTRIBUTE TO
MAKING;
(8) DISCLOSE THE DEGREE TO WHICH THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS INVOLVED IN MAKING THE DECISION DISCLOSED UNDER
ITEM (6) OF THIS SECTION;
(9) DISCLOSE THE DATA THAT THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM USES IN MAKING OR CONTRIBUTING TO MAKING THE
DECISION AND ITS SOURCE;
(10) BE PROVIDED DIRECTLY TO THE CONSUMER, OR IN A MANNER
REASONABLY CALCULATED TO BE ACCESSIBLE BY THE CONSUMER IF PROVIDING
THE DISCLOSURE DIRECTLY IS NOT POSSIBLE;
(11) BE IN PLAIN LANGUAGE;
(12) BE MADE AVAILABLE IN EACH LANGUAGE THAT THE DEPLOYER
REGULARLY USES IN CONTRACTS, DISCLAIMERS, SALE ANNOUNCEMENTS, AND
OTHER INFORMATION PROVIDED TO CONSUMERS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1331 11
(13) BE MADE AVAILABLE IN A FORMAT THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO
CONSUMERS WITH DISABILITIES.
14–5006.
(A) AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT SHALL BE COMPLETED:
(1) AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR; AND
(2) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER AN INTENTIONAL AND SUBSTANTIAL
MODIFICATION OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(B) AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE PURPOSE, INTENDED USE CASES, AND BENEFITS OF THE
HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(2) THE CONTEXT IN WHICH THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WAS DEPLOYED;
(3) AN ANALYSIS OF KNOWN OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS
OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION POSED BY THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(4) A DESCRIPTION OF STEPS TAKEN TO MITIGATE KNOWN OR
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISKS OF ALGORITHMIC DISCRIMINATION POSED BY
THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(5) A DESCRIPTION OF THE INPUTS AND OUTPUTS OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(6) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY DATA USED BY A DEVELOPER TO
CUSTOMIZE THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(7) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY METRICS USED TO EVALUATE THE
PERFORMANCE OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(8) A DESCRIPTION OF KNOWN LIMITATIONS OF THE HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM;
(9) A DESCRIPTION OF TRANSPARENCY MEASURES IMPLEMENTED
REGARDING THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, INCLUDING

HOUSE BILL 1331
MEASURES TAKEN TO DISCLOSE THAT THE SYSTEM IS IN USE TO A CONSUMER WHEN
THE SYSTEM IS IN USE;
(10) A DESCRIPTION OF THE DEPLOYER’S OVERSIGHT PROCESSES,
INCLUDING:
(I) USER SAFEGUARDS PROVIDED; AND
(II) THE DEPLOYER’S PROCESS FOR ADDRESSING ISSUES
ARISING FROM THE DEPLOYMENT OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM; AND
(11) FOR ANY IMPACT ASSESSMENT FOLLOWING THE INITIAL IMPACT
ASSESSMENT OF A HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, A DESCRIPTION
OF THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE USE OF THE HIGH–RISK ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM WAS CONSISTENT WITH THE DEVELOPER’S INTENDED USES.
(C) AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
MAY:
(1) ADDRESS MULTIPLE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR HIGH–RISK
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS; AND
(2) HAVE BEEN CREATED IN ORDER TO COMPLY WITH ANOTHER
REQUIREMENT OTHER THAN THIS SUBTITLE IF THE IMPACT ASSESSMENT SATISFIES
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5007.
(A) THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT A DEVELOPER TOOK
REASONABLE PRECAUTIONS UNDER § 14–5002(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE
DEVELOPER COMPLIED WITH:
(1) § 14–5002 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(B) THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT A DEPLOYER TOOK
REASONABLE PRECAUTIONS UNDER § 14–5003(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE
DEPLOYER COMPLIED WITH:
(1) § 14–5003 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1331 13
(2) REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(C) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY, IN A FORM AND MANNER
PRESCRIBED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, REQUIRE A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER
TO PROVIDE DISCLOSURES OTHERWISE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR
PURPOSES OF EVALUATING THE DISCLOSURE’S COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER MAY DECLINE TO PROVIDE THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL WITH INFORMATION THAT WOULD REQUIRE THE DISCLOSURE
OF TRADE SECRETS OR INFORMATION OTHERWISE PROTECTED BY STATE OR
FEDERAL LAW.
(3) INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE MARYLAND PUBLIC
INFORMATION ACT.
(4) DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION THAT IS
SUBJECT TO ATTORNEY–CLIENT PRIVILEGE OR WORK–PRODUCT PROTECTION DOES
NOT WAIVE THAT PRIVILEGE OR PROTECTION.
14–5008.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT FOR § 13–408 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PREVENT A CONSUMER FROM PURSUING ANY
OTHER REMEDY PROVIDED BY LAW.
SUBTITLE 51. AGREEMENTS CONCERNING VOICE AND LIKENESS CLONES.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3.5–801
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1331
(C) “DIGITAL COPY” MEANS A NEWLY CREATED, ELECTRONIC
REPRESENTATION OF THE IDENTITY OF AN ACTUAL INDIVIDUAL CREATED USING A
COMPUTER, AN ALGORITHM, SOFTWARE, A TOOL, ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, OR
ANY OTHER TECHNOLOGY THAT IS:
(1) FIXED IN A SOUND RECORDING OR AUDIOVISUAL WORK IN WHICH
THE INDIVIDUAL DID NOT ACTUALLY PERFORM OR APPEAR; AND
(2) SO REALISTIC THAT A REASONABLE PERSON WOULD BELIEVE THE
DIGITAL COPY IS A PERFORMANCE BY THE INDIVIDUAL BEING PORTRAYED AND NOT
ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL.
14–5102.
AN AGREEMENT TO PERFORM PERSONAL OR PROFESSIONAL SERVICES IS
UNENFORCEABLE IF:
(1) THE AGREEMENT ALLOWS FOR THE CREATION OR USE OF A
DIGITAL COPY OF A PERSON’S VOICE OR IMAGE INSTEAD OF WORK PERFORMED LIVE
BY THE PERSON;
(2) THE AGREEMENT DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE INTENDED USES OF THE DIGITAL
COPY THAT IS EASILY UNDERSTANDABLE; AND
(II) THE LICENSING TERMS GOVERNING THE USE OF THE
DIGITAL COPY; AND
(3) THE PERSON WAS NOT REPRESENTED BY:
(I) A LAWYER WHO NEGOTIATED ON BEHALF OF THE PERSON
LICENSING THE RIGHTS TO A DIGITAL COPY; OR
(II) A LABOR UNION REPRESENTING WORKERS WHO PERFORM
SIMILAR WORK WITH A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT THAT EXPRESSLY
COVERS THE USE OF DIGITAL COPIES.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1331 15
(c) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine–based system that:
(1) can, for a given set of human–defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) uses machine and human–based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments and abstracts those perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner; and
(3) uses model inference to formulate options for information or action.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.